Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2075.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6137.2(a) of Title 61 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 6137.2. Reentry supervision.(a) General rule.--This section applies to persons committed to the department:(1) with an aggregate minimum sentence of total confinement under 42 Pa.C.S. § 9756(b) (relating to sentence of total confinement) of 4 years or more[.]; or(2) except as provided in 42 Pa.C.S. § 9718.5 (relating to mandatory period of probation for certain sexual offenders), with an aggregate minimum sentence of total confinement under 42 Pa.C.S. § 9756(b) of one year or more if 123456789101112131415161718 the offense involved a victim under 18 years of age.(a.1) Applicability.--Regardless of the sentence imposed, this section does not apply to persons sentenced to death, life imprisonment, persons otherwise ineligible for parole or persons subject to 42 Pa.C.S. § 9718.5 [(relating to mandatory period of probation for certain sexual offenders)].* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2075PN2658 - 2 - 12345678